Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-618
Society names and emblems; registration; procedure; effect.

Application for such registration, alteration or cancellation shall be made by the chief officer or officers of said association, lodge, order, fraternal society, beneficial association, or fraternal and beneficial society or association, historical, military, or veterans organization, labor union, foundation, federation, or any other society, organization, or association, degree, branch, subordinate lodge, or auxiliary thereof, upon blanks to be provided by the Secretary of State; and such registration shall be for the use, benefit, and on behalf of all associations, degrees, branches, subordinate lodges, and auxiliaries of said association, lodge, order, fraternal society, beneficial association, or fraternal and beneficial society or association, historical, military, or veterans organization, labor union, foundation, federation, or any other society, organization or association, degree, branch, subordinate lodge, or auxiliary thereof, and the individual members and those hereafter to become members thereof, throughout this state.

Laws 1929, c. 140, § 2, p. 496;

C.S.1929, § 24-615;

R.S.1943, § 21-618.